Idaho statutes. Title 21 AERONAUTICS
Chapter 6
STATE LANDS RESERVED FOR PUBLIC AIRPORTS

Sec.

§ 21-601, 21-602. Ada County — Description — Lease of lands. [Repealed.]

§ 21-603. Twin Falls County — Description of lands.

The following described state lands are hereby reserved from sale, so long as the same shall be used for the purpose of an airport maintained by public authority.

The northeast quarter of the southwest quarter (NE¼ SW¼), the south half of the northwest quarter (S½ NW¼), the northeast quarter of the northwest quarter (NE¼ NW¼), the northwest quarter of the northwest quarter (NW¼ NW¼), the southwest quarter of the northeast quarter (SW¼ NE¼), the northwest quarter of the northeast quarter (NW¼ NE¼), the southeast quarter of the northeast quarter (SE¼ NE¼), the south half of the southwest quarter (S½ SW¼), the northwest quarter of the southwest quarter (NW¼ SW¼), and the northeast quarter of the northeast quarter (NE¼ NE¼), all in section sixteen (16), township eleven (11), south of range seventeen (17) east of the Boise Meridian, containing four hundred and eighty (480) acres in Twin Falls County, Idaho.

History.

1937, ch. 121, § 1, p. 182.

§ 21-604. Twin Falls County — Lease of lands.

The state board of land commissioners is hereby authorized to lease the lands described in section 21-603[, Idaho Code], for public airport purposes upon such conditions as the board may determine best in the interests of the state and for such a term as said land shall be used for such purposes.

Said lands are now needed and in part used as a portion of a site for an airport to be constructed in cooperation with the federal government, the city of Twin Falls, the works progress administration and other public agencies or organizations which have already spent a large sum of money in the partial construction of such airport.

History.

1937, ch. 121, § 2, p. 182.

§ 21-605. Valley County — Description of lands.

The following described state lands are hereby reserved from sale so long as the same shall be used for the purpose of an airport maintained by public authority.

All of lot seven (7) and the northeast quarter of the northeast quarter of the southwest quarter (NE¼ NE¼ SW¼) of section sixteen (16), township sixteen (16) north, range twelve (12) east of the Boise Meridian; and that portion of lot four (4) of said section 16 described as follows: Beginning at the southwest (SW) corner of lot four (4); thence north six hundred and sixty feet (660 ft.); thence east to the western meander line of the Middle Fork of the Salmon River; thence southeast (SE) following said meander line to the southeast (SE) corner of lot four (4); thence west to the point of beginning, containing fifty (50) acres more or less.

History.

1939, ch. 147, § 1, p. 264.

§ 21-606. Valley County — Lease of lands.

The state board of land commissioners is hereby authorized to lease the lands described in section 21-605[, Idaho Code], for public airport purposes upon such terms and conditions as the board may determine best in the interest of the state and for such a term as said land shall be used for such purposes.

History.

1939, ch. 147, § 2, p. 264.